District of Columbia statutes.
47-125

Outstanding checks of Disbursing Officer — Amounts to be deposited into Treasury.

At the beginning of each fiscal year, or as soon thereafter as may be practicable, the respective amounts represented by checks drawn by the Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia, or by any former Disbursing Officer of said District, which have remained outstanding, unsatisfied, and unpaid for 3 years or more, shall be deposited by the Treasurer of the United States and covered back into the Treasury by warrant to the credit of a permanent appropriation account to be denominated “Outstanding Liabilities, District of Columbia,” and shall be carried to the credit of the respective parties in whose favor such checks were issued upon the books of the Auditor of the District of Columbia, in like manner as the amounts represented by checks of disbursing officers of the United States which have remained outstanding, unsatisfied, and unpaid for 3 years or more are covered back into the Treasury.

Apr. 28, 1904, 33 Stat. 574, ch. 1827, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.
1973 Ed., § 47-124.
1981 Ed., § 47-125.